csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_Cw.yaml
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimizhwaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omizhogowaadogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omizhogowaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimizhwaanaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimizhwaanaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mizhwaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omizhogosiinaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omizhogosiinaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimizhwaasiig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiwaawaag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omizhogosiiwaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omizhogosiiwaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimizhwaasiwaanaanig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiwaanaanig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mizhwaasiiwag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omizhogonaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omizhogonaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimizhwaag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimizhwaawaag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimizhwaag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omizhogowaa'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omizhogowaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimizhwaanaanig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimizhwaanaanig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mizhwaawag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omizhogosiinaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omizhogosiinaawaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimizhwaasiibaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiwaawaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiibaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omizhogosiiwaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omizhogosiiwaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimizhwaasiwaanaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimizhwaasiwaanaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mizhwaasiibaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omizhogonaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omizhogonaawaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimizhwaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimizhwaawaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimizhwaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omizhogowaabane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omizhogowaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimizhwaanaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimizhwaanaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mizhwaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimizhomaasiidogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiwaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiidogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omizhwaasiwaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omizhwaasiidogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimizhomaasiwaanaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiwaanaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv: mizhomaasiidogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimizhomaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimizhomaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimizhomaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omizhwaawaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omizhwaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimizhomaanaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimizhomaanaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv: mizhomaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimizhomaasiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiwaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omizhwaasiwaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omizhwaasiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimizhomaasiwaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiwaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv: mizhomaasiiwan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimizhomaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimizhomaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimizhomaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omizhwaawaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omizhwaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimizhomaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimizhomaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv: mizhomaawan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimizhomaasiibanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiwaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiibanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omizhwaasiwaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omizhwaasiibanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimizhomaasiwaanaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimizhomaasiwaanaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv: mizhomaasiibanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimizhomaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimizhomaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimizhomaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omizhwaawaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omizhwaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimizhomaanaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimizhomaanaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv: mizhomaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogosiininaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogosiininaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogoninaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogoninaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogosiinini
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogosiinini
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogonini
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogonini
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogosiininaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogosiininaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogoninaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omizhogoninaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omizhogosiinaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omizhogosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimizhwaasiidog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiwaawaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiidog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omizhogosiidogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omizhogosiidogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimizhwaasiwaanaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiwaanaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mizhwaasiidog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omizhogonaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omizhogonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimizhwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimizhwaawaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimizhwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omizhogodogena'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omizhogodogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimizhwaanaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimizhwaanaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mizhwaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omizhogosiinan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omizhogosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimizhwaasiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiwaawaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omizhogoosii'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omizhogoosiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimizhwaasiwaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiwaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mizhwaasiin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omizhogonan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omizhogon
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimizhwaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimizhwaawaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimizhwaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omizhogoo'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omizhogoon
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimizhwaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimizhwaanaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mizhwaa
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omizhogosiinaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omizhogosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimizhwaasiiban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiwaawaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiiban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omizhogosiibane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omizhogosiibanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimizhwaasiwaanaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimizhwaasiwaanaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mizhwaasiiban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omizhogonaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omizhogonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimizhwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimizhwaawaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimizhwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omizhogobane'
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omizhogobanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimizhwaanaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimizhwaanaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mizhwaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimizhogosiiminaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimizhogosiiminaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimizhosiiminaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimizhosiiminaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimizhogosiinaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimizhogosiinaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimizhogoosiiminaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimizhogominaadogenan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimizhogominaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimizhominaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimizhominaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimizhogonaadogenag
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimizhogonaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimizhogoominaadog
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimizhogosiimin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimizhogosiimin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimizhosiimin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimizhosiimin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimizhogosiinaanig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimizhogosiinaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimizhogoosiimin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimizhogomin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimizhogomin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimizhomin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimizhomin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimizhogonaanig
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimizhogonaan
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimizhogoomin
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimizhogosiiminaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimizhogosiiminaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimizhosiiminaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimizhosiiminaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimizhogonaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimizhogosiinaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimizhogoosiiminaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimizhogominaabanen
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimizhogominaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimizhominaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimizhominaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimizhogosiinaabaneg
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimizhogonaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+Excl: nimizhogoominaaban
     mizho+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Incl: gimizhogosiiminaadogenan
